Wyoming statutes. Title 17 Corporations, Partnerships and Associations
Article 2. Incorporation

Law reviews. —

For article, “Corporate Expression in Wyoming Ballot Issues, Referenda and Initiatives: A Political and Legal Dilemma,” see XIV Land & Water L. Rev. 449 (1979).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Liability of attorney for improper or ineffective incorporation of client, 40 ALR4th 535.

§ 17-16-201.
Incorporators.

One (1) or more persons may act as the incorporator or incorporators of a corporation by delivering articles of incorporation to the secretary of state for filing.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 249, § 1.

Law reviews. —

For article, “The New Wyoming Business Corporation Act,” see XV Wyo. L.J. 185 (1961).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Corporation's measure of recovery against promoter who has made secret profit in sale of property to corporation, 84 ALR3d 162.

§ 17-16-202.
Articles of incorporation.

The articles of incorporation shall set forth:

A corporate name for the corporation that satisfies the requirements of W.S.

17-16-401

;

The number of shares the corporation is authorized to issue, which may be unlimited if so stated;

The street address of the corporation’s initial registered office and the name of its initial registered agent at that office; and

The name and address of each incorporator.

The articles of incorporation may set forth:

The names and addresses of the individuals who are to serve as the initial directors;

Provisions not inconsistent with law including:

The purpose or purposes for which the corporation is organized;

Managing the business and regulating the affairs of the corporation;

Defining, limiting, and regulating the powers of the corporation, its board of directors, and shareholders;

A par value for authorized shares or classes of shares;

The imposition of personal liability on shareholders for the debts of the corporation to a specified extent and upon specified conditions.

Any provision that under this act is required or permitted to be set forth in the bylaws;

A provision eliminating or limiting the liability of a director to the corporation or its shareholders for money damages for any action taken, or any failure to take any action, as a director, except liability for:

The amount of financial benefit received by a director to which he is not entitled;

An intentional infliction of harm on the corporation or shareholders;

A violation of W.S.

17-16-833

; or

An intentional violation of criminal law; and

A provision permitting or making obligatory indemnification of a director for liability (as defined in W.S. 17-16-850(a)(iii)) to any person for any action taken, or failure to take any action, as a director, except liability for:

Receipt of a financial benefit to which he is not entitled;

An intentional infliction of harm on the corporation or its shareholders;

A violation of W.S.

17-16-833

; or

An intentional violation of criminal law.

The articles of incorporation need not set forth any of the corporate powers enumerated in this act.

Reserved.

The articles of incorporation shall be accompanied by a written consent to appointment signed by the registered agent.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 249, § 1; 1997, ch. 190, § 2; 2009, ch. 115, § 2; 2010, ch. 82, § 1.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, deleted “manually” after “consent to appointment” in (e).

The 2010 amendment,

substituted “17-16-850(a)(iii)” for “17-16-850(a)(v)” in the introductory language of (b)(v).

Laws 2010, ch. 82, § 6, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 9, 2010.

Editor's notes. —

The subsections in this section have been renumbered to align with the Model Business Corporations Act as amended through December, 2007, in accordance with 2009 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 115, § 4.

Meaning of “this act.” —

See note under same catchline following §

17-16-101

.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity of restriction on transfer of stock in articles of incorporation, 65 ALR 1181; 61 ALR2d 1318.

§ 17-16-203.
Incorporation.

Unless a delayed effective date is specified, the corporate existence becomes effective when the articles of incorporation are filed.

The secretary of state’s filing of the articles of incorporation is conclusive proof that the incorporators satisfied all conditions precedent to incorporation except in a proceeding by the state to cancel or revoke the incorporation or involuntarily dissolve the corporation.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 249, § 1; 2010, ch. 82, § 1.

The 2010 amendment,

substituted “becomes effective” for “begins” in (a).

Laws 2010, ch. 82, § 6, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 9, 2010.

§ 17-16-204.
Liability for preincorporation transactions.

All persons purporting to act as or on behalf of a corporation, knowing there was no incorporation under this act, are jointly and severally liable for all liabilities created while so acting.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 249, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

See note under same catchline following §

17-16-101

.

Law reviews. —

For comment, “Wyoming Tort Reform and the Medical Malpractice Insurance Crisis: A Second Opinion,” see XXVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 593 (1993).

§ 17-16-205.
Organization of corporation.

After incorporation:

If initial directors are named in the articles of incorporation, the initial directors shall hold an organizational meeting, at the call of a majority of the directors, to complete the organization of the corporation by appointing officers, adopting bylaws, and carrying on any other business brought before the meeting;

If initial directors are not named in the articles, the incorporator or incorporators shall hold an organizational meeting at the call of a majority of the incorporators to:

Elect directors and complete the organization of the corporation; or

Elect a board of directors who shall complete the organization of the corporation.

Action required or permitted by this act to be taken by incorporators at an organizational meeting may be taken without a meeting if the action taken is evidenced by one (1) or more written consents describing the action taken and signed by each incorporator.

An organizational meeting may be held within or outside of this state.

Within sixty (60) days after filing articles of incorporation, a corporation shall provide information to its registered agent as required by W.S.

17-28-107

.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 249, § 1; 1997, ch. 192, § 2; 2008, ch. 90, § 2; 2009, ch. 115, § 2.

The 2008 amendment,

effective January 1, 2009, in (d), deleted “which maintains a registered agent required to register by W.S. 17 16 505” following “corporation,” substituted “17-28-107” for “17-16-507,” and made a stylistic change.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, deleted “either manually or in facsimile” after “taken and signed” in (b).

Meaning of “this act.” —

See note under same catchline following §

17-16-101

.

§ 17-16-206.
Bylaws.

The incorporators or board of directors of a corporation shall adopt initial bylaws for the corporation.

The bylaws of a corporation may contain any provision for managing the business and regulating the affairs of the corporation that is not inconsistent with law or the articles of incorporation.

If bylaws are not adopted:

An annual meeting shall be held within three (3) months after the close of the corporation’s fiscal year;

The required officers shall be the president, the secretary and the treasurer; and

Bylaws may be adopted at any director or shareholder meeting.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 249, § 1.

Law reviews. —

For note, “Enforcement of an Invalid Bylaw as a Contract Among the Shareholders,” see XV Wyo. L.J. 207 (1961).

For comment, “The New Wyoming Statutory Close Corporation Supplement; Should Your Corporation Elect Statutory Close Corporation Status?,” see XXV Land & Water L. Rev. 589 (1990).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Construction and application of provisions of bylaws providing for restricting sale or transfer of stock, 2 ALR2d 745.

Stockholders' right to inspect books and records of corporation as affected by bylaws, 15 ALR2d 11.

Conflict of laws as to validity and effect of corporate bylaws, 27 ALR2d 435.

Construction and effect of corporate articles, charter or bylaws limiting duration or maturity of indebtedness, 55 ALR2d 949.

Validity of bylaws restricting transfer of stock, 61 ALR2d 1318.

Construction and effect of corporate bylaws or articles relating to change in number of directors, 3 ALR3d 623.

§ 17-16-207.
Emergency bylaws.

Unless the articles of incorporation provide otherwise, the board of directors of a corporation may adopt bylaws to be effective only in an emergency defined in subsection (d) of this section. The emergency bylaws, which are subject to amendment or repeal by the shareholders, may make all provisions necessary for managing the corporation during the emergency, including:

Procedures for calling a meeting of the board of directors;

Quorum requirements for the meeting; and

Designation of additional or substitute directors.

All provisions of the regular bylaws consistent with the emergency bylaws remain effective during the emergency. The emergency bylaws are not effective after the emergency ends.

Corporate action taken in good faith in accordance with the emergency bylaws:

Binds the corporation; and

May not be used to impose liability on a corporate director, officer, employee, or agent.

An emergency exists for purposes of this section if a quorum of the corporation’s directors cannot readily be assembled because of some extraordinary event.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 249, § 1.